Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 181.9445, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Employee. "Employee" means any person who is employed by an employer, including temporary and part-time employees, who is anticipated by the employer to perform work for at least 80 hours in a year for that employer in Minnesota. Employee does not include: (1) an independent contractor; (2) an individual who is a volunteer firefighter or paid on-call firefighter, with a department charged with the prevention or suppression of fires within the boundaries of the state; is a volunteer ambulance attendant as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 15; or is an ambulance service personnel as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 3a, who serves in a paid on-call position; new text begin (3) a person appointed to serve on a board or commission of a governmental subdivision or an instrumentality thereof; new text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end an individual who is an elected official or a person who is appointed to fill a vacancy in an elected office as part of a legislative or governing body of Minnesota or a political subdivision; or deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end an individual employed by a farmer, family farm, or a family farm corporation to provide physical labor on or management of a farm if the farmer, family farm, or family farm corporation employs the individual to perform work for 28 days or less each year.